District of Columbia statutes.
11-1728

Recruitment and training of personnel and travel.

(a)

The Executive Officer shall be responsible for recruiting such qualified personnel as may be necessary for the District of Columbia Courts and for providing in-service training for court personnel.

(b)

Travel under Federal supply schedules is authorized for the travel of court personnel on official business. The joint committee shall prescribe such requirements, conditions and restrictions for such travel as it considers appropriate, and shall include policies and procedures for preventing abuses of that travel authority.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 512, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Oct. 18, 2004, 118 Stat. 1345, Pub. L. 108-335, § 330

History

1981 Ed., § 11-1728.
1973 Ed., § 11-1728.

Prior Codifications

Pub. L. 108-335 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “§ 11-1728. Recruitment and training of personnel. “The Executive Officer shall be responsible for recruiting such qualified personnel as may be necessary for the District of Columbia courts and for providing in-service training for court personnel.”

Effect of Amendments